Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Riots

§ 901.
Duties of officers.

A Superior Court judge, sheriff, deputy sheriff, or constable having notice or knowledge of the unlawful, tumultuous, or riotous assemblage of three or more persons within his or her jurisdiction, among or as near as he or she can safely come to such rioters, shall command them in the name of the State of Vermont immediately and peaceably to disperse. If after such command the rioters do not disperse, such officer or magistrate and any other person as he or she commands to assist him or her shall apprehend and forthwith take them before a Criminal Division of a Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 43, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 96.

§ 902.
Rioters refusing to disperse.

Persons so unlawfully and riotously assembled who, after proclamation made, do not immediately disperse, and persons unlawfully and riotously assembled to the number of three or more who do an unlawful act against a man’s person or property or against the public interest, and persons present at the place of an unlawful or riotous assemblage who, when commanded by a magistrate or officer to assist him or her or to leave the place of such riotous assemblage, fails so to do, shall each be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $100.00, or both.

§ 903.
Hindering officer.

A person who, with force and arms, willfully and knowingly obstructs or in any manner hinders or hurts a person attempting to make proclamation against a riot, shall be punished as provided in section 902 of this title.
Persons riotously assembled to whom proclamation would be made if the same were not hindered, who having knowledge of such hindrance do not immediately disperse, shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $100.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 904.
Officer killing resisting rioter, not liable.

Officers, and persons assisting them, in lawfully dispersing or apprehending such rioters, shall not be liable in a civil or criminal proceeding if a rioter, by reason of his or her resistance, is killed or injured.

§ 905.
Rioters injuring building or vessel.

Persons riotously assembled who destroy or injure a dwelling house or other building, steamboat, or vessel shall each be imprisoned not more than five years and fined not more than $1,000.00, or both, and be answerable to the person injured for the damages in a civil action.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.